North Carolina statutes. Chapter 54B. Savings and Loan Associations.
Article 6A. Fee for Returned Checks.

§ 54B-147.
Collection of processing fee for returned checks.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a processing fee may be charged and collected by any association for checks (including negotiable order of withdrawal drafts) on which payment has been refused by the payor depository institution. An association may also collect said fee for checks drawn on that association with respect to an account with insufficient funds.

History.

1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1238, s. 14; 1985, c. 224.

§§ 54B-148,
54B-149.

Reserved for future codification purposes.